Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE A. DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

For contingent expiration of this chapter, see Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 283 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 5.

CHAPTER 6616. LIBERTY COUNTY DRAINAGE DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6616.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Liberty County Drainage District.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 283 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2019.

Sec. 6616.0102. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a drainage district created in Liberty County under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, subject to approval at a confirmation election under Section 6616.0152.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 283 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2019.

Sec. 6616.0103. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects that are to be accomplished by the district under powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 283 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2019.

Sec. 6616.0104. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district territory is coextensive with the boundaries of Liberty County, Texas.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 283 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 6616.0201. DIRECTORS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors appointed by the Commissioners Court of Liberty County as follows:

(1) one director from each of the four county commissioners precincts; and

(2) one director at large.

(b) To be eligible to serve as a director a person must reside in Liberty County and:

(1) be a qualified voter in the district; or

(2) own land that is taxable in the district.

(c) The board has all powers conferred on a board of directors under Chapter 56, Water Code.

(d) Directors serve staggered terms of four years except for initial directors, two of whom serve two-year terms as agreed on by the initial directors.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 283 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 6616.0301. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has all rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state applicable to a drainage district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 56, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 283 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2019.